Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/kk.aff
SFX J N 54
SFX J 0 да [аоуұыэ]ж
SFX J 0 да [аоуұыэ]з
SFX J 0 да [аоуұыэ]л
SFX J 0 да [аоуұыэ]м
SFX J 0 да [аоуұыэ]н
SFX J 0 да [аоуұыэ]ң
SFX J 0 де [әеёиөүіюя]ж
SFX J 0 де [әеёиөүіюя]з
SFX J 0 де [әеёиөүіюя]л
SFX J 0 де [әеёиөүіюя]м
SFX J 0 де [әеёиөүіюя]н
SFX J 0 де [әеёиөүіюя]ң
SFX J 0 да [аоуұыэ]
SFX J 0 да [аоуұыэ]й
SFX J 0 да [аоуұыэ]р
SFX J 0 да [аоуұыэ]у
SFX J 0 де [әеёиөүіюя]
SFX J 0 де [әеёиөүіюя]й
SFX J 0 де [әеёиөүіюя]р
SFX J 0 де [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]б
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]в
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]г
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]ғ
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]д
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]к
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]қ
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]һ
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]п
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]с
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]т
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]ф
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]х
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]ц
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]ч
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]ш
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]щ
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]б
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]в
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]г
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]ғ
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]д
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]к
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]қ
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]һ
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]п
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]с
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]т
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]ф
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]х
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]ц
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]ч
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]ш
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]щ
SFX j N 54
SFX j 0 дарда [аоуұыэ]ж
SFX j 0 дарда [аоуұыэ]з
SFX j 0 дарда [аоуұыэ]л
SFX j 0 дарда [аоуұыэ]м
SFX j 0 дарда [аоуұыэ]н
SFX j 0 дарда [аоуұыэ]ң
SFX j 0 дерде [әеёиөүіюя]ж
SFX j 0 дерде [әеёиөүіюя]з
SFX j 0 дерде [әеёиөүіюя]л
SFX j 0 дерде [әеёиөүіюя]м
SFX j 0 дерде [әеёиөүіюя]н
SFX j 0 дерде [әеёиөүіюя]ң
SFX j 0 ларда [аоуұыэ]
SFX j 0 ларда [аоуұыэ]й
SFX j 0 ларда [аоуұыэ]р
SFX j 0 ларда [аоуұыэ]у
SFX j 0 лерде [әеёиөүіюя]
SFX j 0 лерде [әеёиөүіюя]й
SFX j 0 лерде [әеёиөүіюя]р
SFX j 0 лерде [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]б
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]в
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]г
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]ғ
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]д
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]к
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]қ
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]һ
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]п
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]с
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]т
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]ф
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]х
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]ц
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]ч
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]ш
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]щ
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]б
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]в
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]г
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]ғ
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]д
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]к
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]қ
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]һ
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]п
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]с
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]т
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]ф
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]х
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]ц
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]ч
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]ш
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]щ
SFX K N 54
SFX K 0 дан [аоуұыэ]
SFX K 0 дан [аоуұыэ]ж
SFX K 0 дан [аоуұыэ]з
SFX K 0 дан [аоуұыэ]й
SFX K 0 дан [аоуұыэ]л
SFX K 0 дан [аоуұыэ]м
SFX K 0 дан [аоуұыэ]н
SFX K 0 дан [аоуұыэ]ң
SFX K 0 дан [аоуұыэ]р
SFX K 0 дан [аоуұыэ]у
SFX K 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя]
SFX K 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя]ж
SFX K 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя]з
SFX K 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя]й
SFX K 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя]л
SFX K 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя]м
SFX K 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя]н
SFX K 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя]ң
SFX K 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя]р
SFX K 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]б
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]в
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]г
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]ғ
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]д
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]к
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]қ
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]һ
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]п
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]с
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]т
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]ф
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]х
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]ц
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]ч
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]ш
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]щ
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]б
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]в
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]г
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]ғ
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]д
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]к
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]қ
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]һ
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]п
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]с
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]т
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]ф
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]х
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]ц
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]ч
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]ш
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]щ
SFX k N 54
SFX k 0 дардан [аоуұыэ]ж
SFX k 0 дардан [аоуұыэ]з
SFX k 0 дардан [аоуұыэ]л
SFX k 0 дардан [аоуұыэ]м
SFX k 0 дардан [аоуұыэ]н
SFX k 0 дардан [аоуұыэ]ң
SFX k 0 дерден [әеёиөүіюя]ж
SFX k 0 дерден [әеёиөүіюя]з
SFX k 0 дерден [әеёиөүіюя]л
SFX k 0 дерден [әеёиөүіюя]м
SFX k 0 дерден [әеёиөүіюя]н
SFX k 0 дерден [әеёиөүіюя]ң
SFX k 0 лардан [аоуұыэ]
SFX k 0 лардан [аоуұыэ]й
SFX k 0 дардан [аоуұыэ]р
SFX k 0 лардан [аоуұыэ]у
SFX k 0 лерден [әеёиөүіюя]
SFX k 0 лерден [әеёиөүіюя]й
SFX k 0 дерден [әеёиөүіюя]р
SFX k 0 лерден [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]б
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]в
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]г
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]ғ
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]д
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]к
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]қ
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]һ
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]п
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]с
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]т
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]ф
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]х
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]ц
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]ч
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]ш
SFX k 0 тардан [аоуұыэ]щ
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]б
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]в
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]г
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]ғ
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]д
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]к
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]қ
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]һ
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]п
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]с
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]т
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]ф
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]х
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]ц
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]ч
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]ш
SFX k 0 терден [әеёиөүіюя]щ
SFX L N 6
SFX L 0 бен [жз]
SFX L 0 бенен [жз]
SFX L 0 мен [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюяйлмнңру]
SFX L 0 менен [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюяйлмнңру]
SFX L 0 пен [бвгғдкқпстфхһцчшщ]
SFX L 0 пенен [бвгғдкқпстфхһцчшщ]
SFX l N 8
SFX l 0 дармен [жзлмнң]
SFX l 0 дарменен [жзлмнң]
SFX l 0 лармен [аоуұыэйр]
SFX l 0 ларменен [аоуұыэйр]
SFX l 0 лермен [әеёиөүіюя]
SFX l 0 лерменен [әеёиөүіюя]
SFX l 0 тармен [бвгғдкқпстфхһцчшщ]
SFX l 0 тарменен [бвгғдкқпстфхһцчшщ]
SFX M N 51
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX M у іп [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX M у п [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюя]у
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]му
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]су
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX M у ып [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX M ю йіп [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX M ю йып [аоуұыэ]ю
