Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/kk.dic
айтылып/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
айығу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
алушылармен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
анодтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
арналмаған/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
астарлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
атқұлақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ашалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ақжиде/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
аңтарылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
баланста/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
балқыту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
башақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
баялау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бекіну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
белок/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
болжырау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бонустар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бунақтану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
білектей/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
білеулеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бұзаулау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бұлтартпа/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бұрқақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бөстір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
герметизациялау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дабырашыл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
дегбірсіздену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дестелі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
дігерлеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дүмпілдес/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
егеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
екшеле/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ерекшелеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ерінбей/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жадыгөйсу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жазғытұрғы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жалыну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жарапазан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жарылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жақынсын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жаңылысу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жирен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жонғыштау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жымырай/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жібермеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жұмыстан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
зарығу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
зыррқ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
илігу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кардиолог/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кеждену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кепте/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кергу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
китіңдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
колхаз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кіші/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
күбіну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
күрлеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
күшсіз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
көмкеру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
көнетоз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
лет/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мазаттандыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
малтаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мап/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
масайрау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
маңыздану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мектептес/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
монша/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мою/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мұндар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мәнерлеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
наркескен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
оазис/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ораңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
органдардың/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
оңба/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
политотдел/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
расталу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
рауаят/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
садырбаев/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сарылдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сарында/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
семья/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сетінеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сопит/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сызғыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сыйғыз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сүйреттір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сүйріктену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сөндіргіш/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
талтақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тапсыруы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тақырыбына/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тиін/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тоздырту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
торсықтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тостағандай/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
туыстары/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тыжырайту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тықырлату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тізбекті/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
түзіліс/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
түйсіндіру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түсіндір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
түсініңкіреу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тұтқындау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тұштаңда/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
төсенішсіз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
төтелеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
фотоаппарат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шайқалдыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шалдыққанын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шарбақталу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шақырғансу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шифрлану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шиыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шыжбалаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шұңқыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ызғарлану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
іңгәлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ғайыс/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қамат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қамдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қарындылау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қатынасы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қашқақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қиқымдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қол/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қорытындылау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қылып/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қырсаусу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
құлаштау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
құрысқақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
үйірсектену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ұлықтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ұстанды/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
өкшелесу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
өмірінде/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
